North Carolina, session 2025, HB647.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-277.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-277.2. Agricultural, horticultural, and forestland – Definitions.
The following definitions apply in G.S. 105-277.3 through G.S. 105-277.7:
…
(1b) Conservation holder. – A nonprofit or private corporation that qualifies as a
"holder" pursuant to G.S. 121-35(2) and that (i) meets the definition of a
"charitable corporation" under G.S. 55A-1-40 and (ii) is organized to receive
and administer agricultural land, horticultural land, or forestland, for the
purpose of preserving the uses of such land in perpetuity.
…
(4) Individually owned. – Owned by one of the following:
…
f. A conservation holder.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 105-277.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-277.3. Agricultural, horticultural, and forestland – Classifications.
(a) Classes Defined. – The following classes of property are designated special classes
of property under authority of Section 2(2) of Article V of the North Carolina Constitution and
must be appraised, assessed, and taxed as provided in G.S. 105-277.2 through G.S. 105-277.7.
…
(b2) Exceptions to Ownership Requirements. – Notwithstanding the provisions of
subsections (b) and (b1) of this section, land may qualify for classification in the hands of the
new owner if all of the conditions listed in either any subdivision of this subsection are met, even
if the new owner does not meet all of the ownership requirements of subsections (b) and (b1) of
this section with respect to the land.
(1) Continued use. – If the land qualifies for classification in the hands of the new
owner under the provisions of this subdivision, then any deferred taxes remain
a lien on the land under G.S. 105-277.4(c), the new owner becomes liable for
the deferred taxes, and the deferred taxes become payable if the land fails to
meet any other condition or requirement for classification. Land qualifies for
*H647-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
classification in the hands of the new owner if all of the following conditions
are met:
a. The land was appraised at its present use present-use value at the time
title to the land passed to the new owner.
…
(3) Use by conservation holder. – If the land qualifies for classification in the
hands of the new owner under the provisions of this subdivision, then any
deferred taxes remain a lien on the land under G.S. 105-277.4(c), the new
owner becomes liable for the deferred taxes, and the deferred taxes become
payable if the land fails to meet any other condition or requirement for
classification. Land qualifies for classification in the hands of the new owner
if all of the following conditions are met:
a. The new owner is a conservation holder.
b. The land was appraised at its present-use value at the time title to the
land passed to the new owner.
c. The new owner uses the land for purposes consistent with the owner's
qualification as a conservation holder.
d. The new owner has timely filed an application as required by
G.S. 105-277.4(a) and has certified that the new owner accepts
liability for any deferred taxes and intends to use the land for purposes
consistent with sub-subdivision c. of this subdivision.
…
(d1) Conservation Easement Exception. – Property that is appraised at its present-use
value under G.S. 105-277.4(b) shall continue to qualify for appraisal, assessment, and taxation
as provided in G.S. 105-277.2 through G.S. 105-277.7 without regard to actual production or
income requirements of this section as long as (i) the property is subject to a qualifying
conservation easement that meets the requirements of G.S. 113A-235(a); and (ii) the taxpayer
received no more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the fair market value of the donated property
interest in compensation. Notwithstanding G.S. 105-277.3(b) and (b1), subsequent transfer of the
property does not extinguish its present-use value eligibility as long as the property remains
subject to a qualifying conservation easement. The exception provided in this subsection applies
only to that part of the property that is subject to the easement.
…
(d4) Conservation Holder Exception. – Property that is appraised at its present-use value
under G.S. 105-277.4(b) shall continue to qualify for appraisal, assessment, and taxation as
provided in G.S. 105-277.2 through G.S. 105-277.7 without regard to the actual production or
income requirements of this section as long as (i) the taxpayer remains a conservation holder and
(ii) the taxpayer continues to use the land for purposes consistent with its qualification as a
conservation holder.
…."
SECTION 3. This act is effective for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on
or after July 1, 2026.
Page 2 House Bill 647-First Edition